North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE II THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT

Section 25.

Repealed by art. amd. 105, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 613, § 3; 1979, ch. 696), effective January 1, 1979. See Article III, §§ 1 to 10, of the renumbered constitution.

The section as amended by art. amd. 81, approved November 3, 1964 (S.L. 1963, ch. 451; 1965, ch. 476, § 1) read:

The legislative power of this state shall be vested in a legislature consisting of a senate and a house of representatives. The people, however, reserve the power, first, to propose measures and to enact or reject the same at the polls; second, to approve
or reject at the polls any measure or any item, section, part or parts of any measure enacted by the legislature.

The first power reserved is the initiative. Ten thousand electors at large may propose any measure by initiative petition. Every such petition shall contain the full text of the measure and shall be filed with the Secretary of State not less than ninety
days before the election at which it is to be voted upon.

The second power reserved is the referendum. Seven thousand electors at large may, by referendum petition, suspend the operation of any measure enacted by the legislature, except an emergency measure. But the filing of a referendum petition against one
or more items, sections or parts of any measure, shall not prevent the remainder from going into effect. Such petition shall be filed with the Secretary of State not later than ninety days after the adjournment of the session of the
legislature at which such measure was enacted.

Each measure initiated by or referred to the electors, shall be submitted by its ballot title, which shall be placed upon the ballot by the Secretary of State and shall be voted upon at any state-wide election designated in the petition, or at a special
election called by the Governor. The result of the vote upon any measure shall be canvassed and declared by the board of canvassers.

Any measure, except an emergency measure, submitted to the electors of the state, shall become a law when approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon. And such law shall go into effect on the thirtieth day after the election, unless otherwise specified
in the measure.

If a referendum petition is filed against an emergency measure such measure shall be a law until voted upon by the electors. And if it is then rejected by a majority of the votes cast thereon, it shall be thereby repealed. Any such measure shall be submitted
to the electors at a special election if so ordered by the Governor, or if the referendum petition filed against it shall be signed by thirty thousand electors at large. Such special election shall be called by the Governor, and shall
be held not less than one hundred nor more than one hundred thirty days after the adjournment of the session of the legislature.

The Secretary of State shall pass upon each petition, and if he finds it insufficient, he shall notify the “Committee for the Petitioners” and allow twenty days for correction or amendment. All decisions of the Secretary of State in regard to any such
petition shall be subject to review by the supreme court. But if the sufficiency of such petition is being reviewed at the time the ballot is prepared, the Secretary of State shall place the measure on the ballot and no subsequent
decision shall invalidate such measure if it is at such election approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon. If proceedings are brought against any petition upon any ground, the burden of proof shall be upon the party attacking
it.

No law shall be enacted limiting the number of copies of a petition which may be circulated. Such copies shall become a part of the original petition when filed or attached thereto. Nor shall any law be enacted prohibiting any person from giving or receiving
compensation for circulating the petitions, nor in any manner interfering with the freedom in securing signatures to petitions.

Each petition shall have printed thereon a ballot title, which shall fairly represent the subject matter of the measure, and the names of at least five electors who shall constitute the “committee for the petitioners” and who shall represent and act for
the petitioners.

The enacting clause of all measures initiated by the electors shall be: “Be it enacted by the people of the State of North Dakota.” In submitting measures to the electors, the Secretary of State and all other officials shall be guided by the election
laws until additional legislation shall be provided.

If conflicting measures initiated by or referred to the electors shall be approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon, the one receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall become the law.

The word “measure” as used herein shall include any law or amendment thereto, resolution, legislative proposal or enactment of any character.

The veto power of the Governor shall not extend to the measures initiated by or referred to the electors. No measure enacted or approved by a vote of the electors shall be repealed or amended by the legislature, except upon a yea and nay vote upon roll
call of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house.

This section shall be self executing and all of its provisions treated as mandatory. Laws may be enacted to facilitate its operation, but no laws shall be enacted to hamper, restrict or impair the exercise of the rights herein reserved to the people.

The section as amended by art. amd. 26, approved November 5, 1918 (S.L. 1919, ch. 88) read:

The legislative power of this state shall be vested in a legislature consisting of a senate and a house of representatives. The people, however, reserve the power, first, to propose measures and to enact or reject the same at the polls; second, to approve
or reject at the polls any measure or any item, section, part or parts of any measure enacted by the legislature.

The first power reserved is the initiative. Ten thousand electors at large may propose any measure by initiative petition. Every such petition shall contain the full text of the measure and shall be filed with the Secretary of State not less than ninety
days before the election at which it is to be voted upon.

The second power reserved is the referendum. Seven thousand electors at large may, by referendum petition, suspend the operation of any measure enacted by the legislature, except an emergency measure. But the filing of a referendum petition against one
or more items, sections or parts of any measure, shall not prevent the remainder from going into effect. Such petition shall be filed with the Secretary of State not later than ninety days after the adjournment of the session of the
legislature at which such measure was enacted.

Each measure initiated by or referred to the electors, shall be submitted by its ballot title, which shall be placed upon the ballot by the Secretary of State and shall be voted upon at any statewide election designated in the petition, or at a special
election called by the Governor. The result of the vote upon any measure shall be canvassed and declared by the board of canvassers.

Any measure, except an emergency measure, submitted to the electors of the state, shall become a law when approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon. And such law shall go into effect on the 30th day after the election, unless otherwise specified
in the measure.

If a referendum petition is filed against an emergency measure, such measure shall be a law until voted upon by the electors. And if it is then rejected by a majority of the votes cast thereon, it shall be thereby repealed. Any such measure shall be submitted
to the electors at a special election if so ordered by the Governor, or if the referendum petition filed against it shall be signed by thirty thousand electors at large. Such special election shall be called by the Governor, and shall
be held not less than one hundred nor more than one hundred thirty days after the adjournment of the session of the legislature.

The Secretary of State shall pass upon each petition, and if he finds it insufficient, he shall notify the “Committee for the Petitioners” and allow twenty days for correction or amendment. All decisions of the Secretary of State in regard to any such
petition shall be subject to review by the Supreme Court. But if the sufficiency of such petition is being reviewed at the time the ballot is prepared, the Secretary of State shall place the measure on the ballot and no subsequent
decision shall invalidate such measure if it is at such election approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon. If proceedings are brought against any petition upon any ground, the burden of proof shall be upon the party attacking
it.

No law shall be enacted limiting the number of copies of a petition which may be circulated. Such copies shall become a part of the original petition when filed or attached thereto. Nor shall any law be enacted prohibiting any person from giving or receiving
compensation for circulating the petitions, nor in any manner interfering with the freedom in securing signatures to petitions.

Each petition shall have printed thereon a ballot title, which shall fairly represent the subject matter of the measure, and the names of at least five electors who shall constitute the “committee for petitioners” and who shall represent and act for the
petitioners.

All measures submitted to the electors shall be published by the state as follows: “The Secretary of State shall cause to be printed and mailed to each elector a publicity pamphlet, containing a copy of each measure together with its ballot title, to
be submitted at any election. Any citizen, or the officers of any organization, may submit to the Secretary of State for publication in such pamphlet, arguments concerning any measure therein, upon first subscribing their names and
addresses thereto and paying the fee therefor, which, until otherwise fixed by the legislature, shall be the sum of two hundred dollars per page.”

The enacting clause of all measures initiated by the electors shall be: “Be it enacted by the people of the State of North Dakota.” In submitting measures to the electors, the Secretary of State and all other officials shall be guided by the election
laws until additional legislation shall be provided.

If conflicting measures initiated by or referred to the electors shall be approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon, the one receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall become the law.

The word “measure” as used herein shall include any law or amendment thereto, resolution, legislative proposal or enactment of any character.

The veto power of the Governor shall not extend to the measures initiated by or referred to the electors. No measure enacted or approved by a vote of the electors shall be repealed or amended by the legislature, except upon a yea and nay vote upon roll
call of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house.

This section shall be self executing and all of its provisions treated as mandatory. Laws may be enacted to facilitate its operation, but no laws shall be enacted to hamper, restrict or impair the exercise of the rights herein reserved to the people.

The section as amended by art. amd. 15, approved November 3, 1914 (S.L. 1911, ch. 93; 1913, ch. 101 read:

The legislative authority of the State of North Dakota shall be vested in a (the) legislative assembly consisting of a senate and house of representatives, but the people reserve to themselves (the) power to propose laws and to enact or (and) reject the
same at the polls, independent of the legislative assembly, and also reserve power, at their own option, to approve or reject at the polls any act, item, section or part of any act or measure passed by the legislative assembly. The
first power reserved by the people is the initiative, or the power to propose measures for enactment into laws, and at least ten per cent of the legal voters to be secured in a majority of the counties of this state shall be required
to propose any measure by initiative petition, and every such petition shall include the full text of the measure so proposed. Initiative petitions shall be filed with the Secretary of State not less than thirty days before any regular
session of the legislative assembly; he shall transmit the same to the legislative assembly as soon as it convenes. Such initiative measure shall take precedence over all other measures in the legislative assembly except appropriation
bills, and shall be either enacted or rejected without change or amendment by the legislative assembly within forty days. If any such initiative measures shall be enacted by the legislative assembly it shall be subject to referendum
petition, or it may be referred by the legislative assembly to the people for approval or rejection. If it is rejected or no action is taken upon it by the legislative assembly within said forty days, the Secretary of State shall submit
it to the people for approval or rejection at the next ensuing regular general election. The legislative assembly may reject any measure so proposed by initiative petition and propose a different one to accomplish the same purpose,
and in any such event both measures shall be submitted by the Secretary of State to the people for approval or rejection at the next ensuing regular election. If conflicting measures submitted to the people at the next ensuing election
shall be approved by a majority of the votes severally cast for and against the same, the one receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall thereby become valid and the other shall thereby be rejected. The second power is
the referendum, or the power to order any act, item, or part of any act to be referred to the people for their approval or rejection at the polls, and it may be ordered (except as to laws necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health or safety), as to any measure or any parts, items or sections of any measures passed by the legislative assembly either by a petition signed by ten per cent of the legal voters of the state from a majority
of the counties or by the legislative assembly, if a majority of the members-elect vote therefor. When it is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health or safety that a law shall become effective without delay,
such necessity and the facts creating the same shall be stated in one section of the bill, and if upon aye and nay vote in each house two-thirds of all the members elected to each house shall vote on a separate roll call in favor of
the said law going into instant operation for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health or safety, such law shall become operative upon approval by the Governor.

The filing of a referendum petition against one or more items, sections or parts of an act shall not delay the remainder of that act from becoming operative. Referendum petitions against measures passed by the legislative assembly shall be filed with
the Secretary of State not more than ninety days after the final adjournment of the session of the legislative assembly which passed the measure on which the referendum is demanded. The veto power of the Governor shall not extent to
measures referred to the people. All elections on measures referred to the people of the state shall be had at biennial regular elections, except as provision(s) may be made by law for a special election or elections. Any measure referred
to the people shall take effect when it is approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon and not otherwise and shall be in force from the date of the official declaration of the vote.

The enacting clause of all initiative bills shall be “Be it enacted by the people of the State of North Dakota.” This Section shall not be construed to deprive any member of the legislative assembly of the right to introduce any measure. The whole number
of votes cast for Secretary of State at the regular election last preceding the filing of any petition for the initiative or for the referendum shall be the basis on which the number of legal voters necessary to sign such petition
shall be counted.

Petitions and orders for the initiative and for the referendum shall be filed with the Secretary of State, and in submitting the same to the people he and all other officers shall be guided by the general laws and the acts submitting this amendment until
legislation shall be especially provided therefor.

This amendment shall be self-executing, but legislation may be enacted to facilitate its operation.

The section as originally adopted read:

The legislative power shall be vested in a Senate and house of representatives.

Section 26.

The 1960 amendment of this section held unconstitutional. See note following Article IV, § 2 of the renumbered constitution.

Section 27.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 3.

Section 28.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 4.

Section 29.

The 1960 amendment of this section held unconstitutional. See note following Article IV, § 5 of the renumbered constitution.

Section 30.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 6.

Section 31.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 7.

Section 32.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 8.

Section 33.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 9.

Section 34.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 10.

Section 35.

The 1960 amendment of this section held unconstitutional. See note following Article IV, § 11 of the renumbered constitution.

Section 36.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 12.

Section 37.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 13.

Section 38.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 15.

Section 39.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 17.

Section 40.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 14.

Section 41.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 16.

Section 42.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 20.

Section 43.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 21.

Section 44.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 19.

Section 45.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 46.

Section 46.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 25.

Section 47.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 26.

Section 48.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 27.

Section 49.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 29.

Section 50.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 28.

Section 51.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 24.

Section 52.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 1.

Section 53.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 22.

Section 54.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 30.

Section 55.

Repealed by art. amd. 95, approved September 7, 1976 (S.L. 1975, ch. 611, § 3; 1977, ch. 596). The section as originally adopted read:

The sessions of the Legislative Assembly shall be biennial, except as otherwise provided in this Constitution.

Section 56.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 23.

Section 57.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 31.

Section 58.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 32.

Section 59.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 34.

Section 60.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 35.

Section 61.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 33.

Section 62.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 36.

Section 63.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 37.

Section 64.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 38.

Section 65.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 39.

Section 66.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 40.

Section 67.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 41.

Section 68.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 42.

Section 69.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 43.

Section 70.

Renumbered as Article IV, § 44.